Nebraska, session 109, LB578.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB578 LB578
2025 2025
Section 1. For purposes of sections 1 to 5 of this act:
(1) Administrator means:
(a) In the case of a county jail, the sheriff; and
(b) In the case of a city jail, the officer in charge of such jail;
(2) Inmate means a person serving a sentence who is committed to a
jail; and
(3) Jail includes a county jail as defined in section 47-117 and any
city jail as defined in section 47-207.
Sec. 2. (1) Any inmate employed by the city, county, or any other
person shall be paid wages equal to or greater than those required by the
Wage and Hour Act.
(2) Each administrator shall open a deposit account for any county
jail inmate earning wages as described in subsection (1) of this section.
Sec. 3. (1) Except when an inmate returns to the employment held at
the time of arrest, such employment shall not result in the displacement
of employed workers, be applied in skills, crafts, or trades in which
there is a surplus of available gainful labor in the locality, or impair
existing contracts for services, and the rates of pay and other
conditions of employment shall not be less than for work of similar
nature in the locality in which the work is to be performed.
(2) The Jail Standards Board shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations governing the hours, the conditions of labor, and the rates
of compensation of inmates. In determining the rates of compensation,
such regulations may take into consideration the quantity and quality of
the work performed by such person, whether or not such work was performed
during regular working hours, the skill required for its performance, and
the economic value of similar work outside of jails.
(3) The Jail Standards Board shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations which will protect inmates' rights to due process and govern
the collection of restitution as provided in section 4 of this act.
(4) No inmate shall be required to engage in excessive labor, and no
-2-

LB578 LB578
2025 2025
inmate shall be required to perform any work for which he or she is
declared unfit by a physician designated by the administrator. No inmate
who performs labor or work pursuant to this section shall be required to
wear manacles, shackles, or other restraints.
Sec. 4. (1) The Jail Standards Board, in consultation with the
State Court Administrator, shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to provide an effective process for the transfer of funds for
the purpose of satisfying restitution orders.
(2) A sentencing order requiring an inmate to pay restitution shall
be treated as a court order authorizing the administrator to withhold and
transfer funds for the purpose of satisfying a restitution order.
(3) This section applies to funds in the wage fund of any inmate
confined in a jail on or after the effective date of this act.
(4) The Jail Standards Board shall report annually to the
Legislature on the collection of restitution from wage funds. The report
shall include the total number of inmates with restitution judgments, the
average amount of payments, and the total amount of restitution
collected. The report shall be submitted electronically.
(5) Each administrator shall report annually to the Jail Standards
Board, in a form and manner as prescribed by the board, such information
as is necessary to make the report required by subsection (4) of this
section.
Sec. 5. Notwithstanding the fact that the federal Occupational
Safety and Health Act may not apply to the employment of an inmate by a
jail, the jail and administrator shall act in accordance with the
requirements of the act and regulations adopted thereunder.
Sec. 6. Section 29-2414, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
29-2414 For the purpose of enabling the county board of any county
in this state to employ in a profitable manner all persons who have
heretofore been or may hereafter be sentenced to imprisonment hard labor
-3-

LB578 LB578
2025 2025
in the jail of the county, the board, or a majority of them, shall have
power to designate the place where the persons so sentenced shall work,
and to make all proper and needful regulations and provisions for the
profitable employment of such convicts, and for their safe custody during
such employment. The county jail is hereby declared to extend to any
stone quarry, road or other place that shall be designated by the county
board for the employment of such convicts.
Sec. 7. Section 29-2415, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
29-2415 It shall be the duty of the county board to make the
contracts for the employment of convicts as specified in section 29-2414,
and the sheriff of the county, or such other person as may be charged
with the administrative direction of the jail, shall collect the proceeds
of all such labor and proceed as directed in sections 1 to 5 of this
act , and after paying the board of such convicts and the expenses
incident to such labor, to pay the balance to the county treasurer within
ten days.
Sec. 8. Section 29-2708, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
29-2708 All money arising from fines and recognizances shall be
credited by the county treasurer to the county school fund except as
provided by Article VII, section 5, Constitution of Nebraska, and,
subject to sections 1 to 5 of this act, the costs and proceeds of jail
labor shall be credited to the county general fund. Whenever any costs in
any criminal case are paid from the county treasury, such payment shall
be made from the county general fund; and when any warrant is drawn by
the county clerk upon the treasurer of the county for the payment of such
costs, a true record of the same and the definite purpose of every such
warrant shall be recorded in the clerk's office showing the cause in
which such costs are paid.
Sec. 9. Section 33-157, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-4-

LB578 LB578
2025 2025
amended to read:
33-157 (1) In addition to all other costs assessed according to law,
an assessment of one dollar shall be assessed for each conviction of a
person for any misdemeanor or felony in county court or district court
and each affirmation on appeal. No such assessment shall be collected in
any juvenile court proceeding. No county shall be liable for the
assessment imposed pursuant to this section. The assessments shall be
remitted to the State Treasurer on forms prescribed by the State
Treasurer within ten days after the end of the month.
(2) The Nebraska Crime Victim Fund is created. The fund shall
contain the amounts remitted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
and section 83-184. The fund shall be administered by the Nebraska
Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice. As soon as funds
become available, the commission shall direct the State Treasurer to
transfer money from the Nebraska Crime Victim Fund to the Department of
Correctional Services Facility Cash Fund and the Supreme Court Automation
Cash Fund to pay for the initial costs in implementing Laws 2010, LB510,
in amounts to be determined by the Department of Correctional Services
and the Supreme Court and certified to the commission. When such costs
are fully reimbursed, the Nebraska Crime Victim Fund shall terminate and
the State Treasurer shall distribute seventy-five percent of the funds
remitted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and section 83-184 to
the Victim's Compensation Fund to be awarded as compensation for losses
and expenses allowable under the Nebraska Crime Victim's Reparations Act
and shall distribute twenty-five percent of such funds to the Reentry
Cash Fund.
Sec. 10. Section 47-208, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
47-208 The governing board of every city and village may employ at
labor on the public streets and other public improvements, persons
confined in the jail of such city or village, as the case may be, on
-5-

LB578 LB578
2025 2025
account of conviction for violation of statutes or ordinances. The
governing board shall prescribe rules and regulations governing
employment and safekeeping, and determine what compensation , if any,
such prisoners shall receive for their services, subject to the Wage and
Hour Act and sections 1 to 5 of this act.
Sec. 11. Section 48-1202, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-1202 For purposes of the Wage and Hour Act, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(1) Employ includes shall include to permit to work;
(2) Employer includes shall include any individual, partnership,
limited liability company, association, corporation, business trust,
legal representative, or organized group of persons employing four or
more employees at any one time except for seasonal employment of not more
than twenty weeks in any calendar year, acting directly or indirectly in
the interest of an employer in relation to an employee. Employer includes
the State of Nebraska and its political subdivisions, but shall not
include the United States , the state, or any political subdivision
thereof;
(3) Employee includes shall include any individual employed by any
employer, including committed offenders or inmates employed by the
Department of Correctional Services or a jail, but shall not include:
(a) Any individual employed in agriculture;
(b) Any individual employed as a baby-sitter in or about a private
home;
(c) Any individual employed in a bona fide executive,
administrative, or professional capacity or as a superintendent or
supervisor;
(d) Any individual employed by the United States or by the state or
any political subdivision thereof;
(e) An individual serving as a member of a governmental board,
-6-

LB578 LB578
2025 2025
council, commission, or committee of state or local government, or as a
member of any entity described in subdivision (1)(a) of section 84-1409;
(f) An individual whose wages are specifically set by another
statute;
(g) (e) Any individual engaged in the activities of an educational,
charitable, religious, or nonprofit organization when the employer-
employee relationship does not in fact exist or when the services
rendered to such organization are on a voluntary basis;
(h) (f) Apprentices and learners otherwise provided by law;
(i) (g) Veterans in training under supervision of the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs;
(j) (h) A child in the employment of his or her parent or a parent
in the employment of his or her child; or
(k) (i) Any person who, directly or indirectly, is receiving any
form of federal, state, county, or local aid or welfare and who is
physically or mentally disabled and employed in a program of
rehabilitation, who shall receive a wage at a level consistent with his
or her health, efficiency, and general well-being;
(4) Occupational classification means shall mean a classification
established by the Dictionary of Occupational Titles prepared by the
United States Department of Labor; and
(5) Wages means shall mean all remuneration for personal services,
including commissions and bonuses and the cash value of all remunerations
in any medium other than cash.
Sec. 12. Section 73-814, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
73-814 (1) The division may, by written order, permit contracts to
be made by any state agency directly with the vendor or supplier whenever
it appears to the satisfaction of the division that, because of the
unique nature of the personal property, the price in connection
therewith, the quantity to be purchased, the location of the state
-7-

LB578 LB578
2025 2025
agency, the time of the use of the personal property, or any other
circumstance, the interests of the state will be served better by
purchasing or contracting direct.
(2) Such permission shall be revocable and shall be operative for a
period not exceeding twelve months from the date of issue. Upon the
request of the division, state agencies receiving such permission shall
report their acts and expenditures under such orders to the division in
writing at such time and covering such period as may be required by the
division.
(3) The division shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
establishing criteria which must be met by any agency seeking direct
market purchase authorization. Purchases for miscellaneous needs may be
made directly by any agency without prior approval from the division for
purchases of less than fifty thousand dollars if the agency has completed
a certification program as prescribed by the division.
(4) The Department of Correctional Services may purchase raw
materials, supplies, component parts, and equipment perishables directly
for industries established pursuant to section 83-183, whether such
purchases are made to fill specific orders or for general inventories.
Any such purchase shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars. The department
shall comply with the bidding process of the division and shall be
subject to audit by the division for such purchases.
Sec. 13. Section 81-1835, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1835 The Victim's Compensation Fund is created. The fund shall be
used to pay awards or judgments under the Nebraska Crime Victim's
Reparations Act other than distributions from the Community Trust. The
fund shall include deposits pursuant to sections 29-2286, 33-157, and
81-1836, 83-183.01, and 83-184 and donations or contributions from public
or private sources and shall be in such amount as the Legislature shall
determine to be reasonably sufficient to meet anticipated claims. When
-8-

LB578 LB578
2025 2025
the amount of money in the fund is not sufficient to pay any awards or
judgments under the act, the Director of Administrative Services shall
immediately advise the Legislature and request an emergency appropriation
to satisfy such awards and judgments. Any money in the fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
Sec. 14. Section 83-183, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-183 (1) To establish good habits of work and responsibility, to
foster vocational training, and to reduce the cost of operating the
facilities, persons committed to the department shall be employed, eight
hours per day, so far as possible in constructive and diversified
activities in the production of goods, services, and foodstuffs to
maintain the facilities, for state use, and for other purposes authorized
by law. To accomplish these purposes, the director may establish and
maintain industries and farms in appropriate facilities and may enter
into arrangements with any other board or agency of the state, any
natural resources district, or any other political subdivision, except
that any arrangements entered into with school districts, educational
service units, community colleges, state colleges, or universities shall
include supervision provided by the department, for the employment of
persons committed to the department for state or governmental purposes.
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to effect a reduction in
the number of work release positions.
(1) (2) The director shall make rules and regulations governing the
hours, the conditions of labor, and the rates of compensation of persons
committed to the department. In determining the rates of compensation,
such regulations may take into consideration the quantity and quality of
the work performed by such person, whether or not such work was performed
during regular working hours, the skill required for its performance, and
-9-

LB578 LB578
2025 2025
the economic value of similar work outside of correctional facilities.
(3) Except as provided in section 83-183.01, wage payments to a
person committed to the department shall be set aside by the chief
executive officer of the facility in a separate fund. The fund shall
enable such person committed to the department to contribute to the
support of his or her dependents, if any, to make necessary purchases
from the commissary, to set aside sums to be paid to him or her at the
time of his or her release from the facility, and to pay restitution if
restitution is required.
(2) (4) The director shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations which will protect the committed offender's rights to due
process and govern the collection of restitution as provided in section
83-184.01.
(5) The director may authorize the chief executive officer to invest
the earnings of a person committed to the department. Any accrued
interest thereon shall be credited to such person's fund.
(6) The director may authorize the chief executive officer to
reimburse the state from the wage fund of a person committed to the
department for:
(a) The actual value of property belonging to the state or any other
person intentionally or recklessly destroyed by such person committed to
the department during his or her commitment;
(b) The actual value of the damage or loss incurred as a result of
unauthorized use of property belonging to the state or any other person
by such person committed to the department;
(c) The actual cost to the state for injuries or other damages
caused by intentional acts of such person committed to the department;
and
(d) The reasonable costs incurred in returning such person committed
to the department to the facility to which he or she is committed in the
event of his or her escape.
-10-

LB578 LB578
2025 2025
(3) (7) No person committed to the department shall be required to
engage in excessive labor, and no such person shall be required to
perform any work for which he or she is declared unfit by a physician
designated by the director. No person who performs labor or work pursuant
to this section shall be required to wear manacles, shackles, or other
restraints.
(8) The director may authorize that a portion of the earnings of a
person committed to the department be retained by that person for
personal use.
Sec. 15. Section 83-183.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-183.01 (1) A person committed to the department , who is earning
at least minimum wage and is employed by the department or any other
person pursuant to sections 81-1827 and 83-183, shall be paid wages equal
to or greater than those required by the Wage and Hour Act. have his or
her wages set aside by the chief executive officer of the facility in a
separate wage fund. The director shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations which will protect the inmate's rights to due process,
provide for hearing as necessary before the Crime Victim's Reparations
Committee, and govern the disposition of a confined person's gross
monthly wage minus required payroll deductions and payment of necessary
work-related incidental expenses for the following purposes:
(2) The department shall open a deposit account for any committed
offender earning wages as described in subsection (1) of this section.
(1) For the support of families and dependent relatives of the
respective inmates;
(2) For the discharge of any legal obligations, including judgments
for restitution as provided in section 83-184.01;
(3) To pay all or a part of the cost of their board, room, clothing,
medical, dental, and other correctional services;
(4) To provide for funds payable to the person committed to the
-11-

LB578 LB578
2025 2025
department upon his or her release;
(5) For the actual value of state property intentionally or
willfully and wantonly destroyed by such person during his or her
commitment;
(6) For reasonable costs incurred in returning such person to the
facility to which he or she is committed in the event of escape; and
(7) For deposit in the Victim's Compensation Fund.
Sec. 16. Section 83-184, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-184 (1) When the conduct, behavior, mental attitude, and
conditions indicate that a person committed to the department and the
general society of the state will be benefited, and there is reason to
believe that the best interests of the people of the state and the person
committed to the department will be served thereby, in that order, the
director may authorize such person, under prescribed conditions, to:
(a) Visit a specifically designated place or places and return to
the same or another facility. An extension of limits may be granted to
permit a visit to a dying relative, attendance at the funeral of a
relative, the obtaining of medical services, the contacting of
prospective employers, or for any other reason consistent with the public
interest;
(b) Work at paid employment or participate in a training program in
the community on a voluntary basis whenever:
(i) Such paid employment will not result in the displacement of
employed workers, or be applied in skills, crafts, or trades in which
there is a surplus of available gainful labor in the locality, or impair
existing contracts for services; and
(ii) The rates of pay and other conditions of employment will not be
less than those paid or provided for work of similar nature in the
locality in which the work is to be performed; or
(c) Leave the facility to participate in substance abuse evaluations
-12-

LB578 LB578
2025 2025
or treatment, attend rehabilitative programming or treatment, seek
residency or employment, or participate in structured programming as
provided in section 83-182.01 and return to the same or another facility.
The department shall collaborate with community-based providers to
enhance the availability of community-based options for such
participation that meet the department's requirements for rehabilitative
programming or treatment or structured programming.
(2) The wages earned by a person authorized to work at paid
employment in the community under this section shall be credited by the
chief executive officer of the facility to such person's deposit account
under section 83-183.01. wage fund. The director shall authorize the
chief executive officer to withhold up to five percent of such person's
net wages. The funds withheld pursuant to this subsection shall be
remitted to the State Treasurer for credit as provided in subsection (2)
of section 33-157.
(3) A person authorized to work at paid employment in the community
under this section may be required to pay, and the director is authorized
to collect, such costs incident to the person's confinement as the
director deems appropriate and reasonable. Collections shall be deposited
in the state treasury as miscellaneous receipts.
(3) (4) A person authorized to work at paid employment in the
community under this section may be required to pay restitution. The
director shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations which will
protect the committed offender's rights to due process and govern the
collection of restitution as provided in section 83-184.01.
(4) (5) The willful failure of a person to remain within the
extended limits of his or her confinement or to return within the time
prescribed to a facility designated by the director may be deemed an
escape from custody punishable as provided in section 28-912.
(5) (6) No person employed in the community under this section or
otherwise released shall, while working in such employment in the
-13-

LB578 LB578
2025 2025
community or going to or from such employment or during the time of such
release, be deemed to be an agent, employee, or servant of the state.
Sec. 17. Section 83-184.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-184.01 (1) The department, in consultation with the State Court
Administrator, shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
provide an effective process for the transfer of funds for the purpose of
satisfying restitution orders.
(2) A sentencing order requiring an inmate to pay restitution shall
be treated as a court order authorizing the department to withhold and
transfer funds for the purpose of satisfying a restitution order.
(3) This section applies to funds in the wage fund of any inmate
confined in a correctional facility on or after August 30, 2015.
(4) The department shall report annually to the Legislature on the
collection of restitution from inmates wage funds. The report shall
include the total number of inmates with restitution judgments, the total
number of inmates with wage funds, the total number of inmates with both,
the number of payments made to either victims or clerks of the court, the
average amount of payments, and the total amount of restitution
collected. The report shall be submitted electronically.
Sec. 18. Section 83-187, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-187 (1) When a person committed to the department is released
from a facility on parole, on post-release supervision, or upon final
discharge, the person shall be returned any personal possessions taken
upon confinement, and the chief executive officer of the facility shall
furnish the person with a written notice as required in section 83-1,118,
clothing appropriate for the season of the year, a transportation ticket
to the place where he or she will reside, if within the continental
limits of the United States or if not, the state may purchase
transportation to the nearest United States border en route to such
-14-

LB578 LB578
2025 2025
residence, and such sum of money as may be prescribed by the regulations
of the department to enable the person to meet his or her immediate
needs. If at the time of release the person is too ill or feeble or
otherwise unable to use public means of transportation, the chief
executive officer may make special arrangements for transportation to the
place where the person will reside.
(2) At the time of release, the person shall also be given full
control of his or her deposit account created under section 83-183.01
paid his or her earnings and any accrued interest thereon set aside in
the wage fund. Such earnings and interest shall be paid either in a lump
sum or otherwise as determined by the chief executive officer to be in
the best interest of the person. No less than one-third of such fund
shall be paid upon release, and the entire fund shall be paid within six
months of the person's release.
(3) The department shall send a copy of the release or discharge to
the court which committed the person and also to the sheriff of the
county in which the court is located and, when such county contains a
city of the metropolitan class, to the police department of such city.
Sec. 19. Notwithstanding the fact that the federal Occupational
Safety and Health Act may not apply to the employment of a person
committed to the department, the department shall act in accordance with
the requirements of the act and regulations adopted thereunder.
Sec. 20. Section 83-1,135, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-1,135 Sections 83-170 to 83-1,135.05 and section 19 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Treatment and Corrections
Act.
Sec. 21. Section 83-917, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-917 The Reentry Cash Fund is created. The fund shall be
administered by the Department of Correctional Services. The State
-15-

LB578 LB578
2025 2025
Treasurer shall credit funds remitted pursuant to section sections 33-157
and 83-184 and donations or contributions from public or private sources
to the Reentry Cash Fund. The fund shall be used by the department for
tuition, fees, and other costs associated with reentry and reintegration
programs offered to offenders that are placed in the incarceration work
camp. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion
Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 22. Original sections 29-2414, 29-2415, 29-2708, 33-157,
47-208, 48-1202, 81-1835, 83-183, 83-183.01, 83-184, 83-184.01, 83-187,
83-1,135, and 83-917, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and section
73-814, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 23. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections
47-403, 47-404, and 47-406, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-16-